src/phonology/deu-phon.twolc
Alphabet
 a b c d e f g h i j k l m n o p q r s t u v w x y z æ ø å
 á é ó ú í à è ò ù ì ä ë ö ü ï â ê ô û î ã ý þ ñ ð ß ç

 A B C D E F G H I J K L M N O P Q R S T U V W X Y Z Æ Ø Å
 Á É Ó Ú Í À È Ò Ù Ì Ä Ë Ö Ü Ï Â Ê Ô Û Î Ã Ý þ Ñ Ð



 %#:0 %>:0


!! TRIGGER
 %^A2E:0		!!≈ * @CODE@ 
 %^A2I:0		!!≈ * @CODE@ 
 %^A2O:0		!!≈ * @CODE@ 
 %^A2Ö:0		!!≈ * @CODE@ 
 %^A2U:0		!!≈ * @CODE@ 
 %^A2Ü:0		!!≈ * @CODE@ 
 %^A2IE:0		!!≈ * @CODE@ 
 %^O2E:0		!!≈ * @CODE@ 
 %^O2I:0		!!≈ * @CODE@ 
 %^O2IE:0		!!≈ * @CODE@ 
 %^EI2IE:0		!!≈ * @CODE@ 
 %^EI2I:0		!!≈ * @CODE@ 
 %^CC2C:0	    !!≈ * @CODE@ mm:m0 kommen kommst kamst
 %^DeV:0	    !!≈ * @CODE@ g0:ch
 %^LowerVow:0 !!≈ * @CODE@ o:a 
%^Pen:0   !!≈ * @CODE@ penultimate syllable
%^RmVow:0 !!≈ * @CODE@ remove vowel
 %^Umlaut:0 !!≈ * @CODE@ umlaut a:ä, o:ö, u:ü
;


Sets
 Vow = a e i o u y æ ø å ä ö ü 
       A E I O U Y Æ Ø Å Ä Ö Ü ;
 Cns = b c d f g h j k l m n p q r s t v w x z ß 
       B C D F G H J K L M N P Q R S T V W X Z;
 LNR = l n r ;
 Dummy = %^Umlaut %^LowerVow %^DeV %^Pen %^RmVow %^A2IE %^O2IE %^A2E 
 ;  ! %+ 


Rules

"Umlaut"
 Vx:Vy <=>  [Cns|#] _ Cns:+ (0:) ( e LNR ) %^Umlaut:  ;
    where Vx in (u o U O)
          Vy in (ü ö Ü Ö)
          matched ;
          
!!€ Boden%^Umlaut%>#
!!€ Böden000

!!$ Boden%^Umlaut%>#
!!$ Boden000

"Vowel lowering"
 Vx:Vy <=>  
 Cns  _ Cns:+ ( e LNR )  %^LowerVow: ;
          where Vx in (o O)
                Vy in (a A)
          matched ;
!!€ konn%^LowerVow
!!€ kann0


"Umlaut vor Vokal" 
 Vx:Vy <=>  [Cns|#] _ [ u | a: ] Cns:+ ( e LNR ) %^Umlaut:   ;
            [Cns|#] _ Cns:+ ( e LNR ) %^Umlaut:   ;
    where Vx in (a A)
          Vy in (ä Ä)
          matched ;         
 
!!€ Baum%^Umlaut%>e#
!!€ Bäum00e0

!!€ Apfel%^Umlaut
!!€ Äpfel0

!!€ Napf%^Umlaut%>e#
!!€ Näpf00e0

!!$ Napf%^Umlaut%>e#
!!$ Napf00e0


"vowel change o:e "
o:e <=>
 Cns: _ Cns:* %^O2E: ;

!! dreschen+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1
!!€ drosch%^O2E%>en
!!€ dresch0%>en


"vowel change a:e "
a:e <=>
 Cns: _ (:0) Cns:+  %^A2E: ;

!! geben+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1
!!€ gab%^A2E%>e
!!€ geb0%>e


"vowel change a:i "
a:i <=>
 Cns: _ Cns:+ %^A2I: ;
!! geben+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2
!!€ gab%^A2I%>st
!!€ gib0%>st
 Cns: _ 0: (u:) Cns:+ %^A2IE: ;
!! halten+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2
!!€ ha0lt%^A2IE%>e%>st
!!€ hielt0%>e%>st
!! fallen+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1
!!€ fa0ll%^A2IE%^CC2C%>en
!!€ fiel00%>en


"vowel change a:o "
a:o <=>
 Cns: _ Cns:+ %^A2O: ;

!! schwimmen+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2
!!€ schwamm%^A2I%>st
!!€ schwimm0%>st

"vowel change a:u "
a:u <=>
 Cns: _ Cns:+ %^A2U: ;

!! fahren+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2
!!€ fahr%^A2U%>st
!!€ fuhr0%>st

"vowel change a:ü "
 a:ü <=>
 Cns: _ Cns:+ %^A2Ü: ;
!! fahren+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2
!!€ fahr%^A2Ü%>st
!!€ führ0%>st

"vowel change a:ö "
 a:ö <=>
 Cns: _ Cns:+ %^A2Ö: ;
!! gelten+V+Subj+Prt+Sg1
!!€ galt%^A2Ö%>e
!!€ gölt0%>e

"vowel change o:i "
o:i <=>
 Cns: _ 0: Cns:+ %^O2IE: ;
!! stoßen+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2
!!€ sto0ß%^O2IE%>e%>st
!!€ stieß0%>e%>st
 Cns: _ Cns:* %^O2I: ;
!! dreschen+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3
!!€ drosch%^O2I%>t
!!€ drisch0%>t

"Entfernung von a in aa Umlaut"
a:0 <=> a: _ Cns:+ ( e LNR ) %^Umlaut:   ;

!!€ Saal%^Umlaut%>e#
!!€ Sä0l00e0

"Word-final o to zero"
o:0 <=> Cns: _ %^RmVow: ;
!! Salto
!!€ Salto%^RmVow
!!€ Salt00

"ss2ß"
s:ß <=>
 [Vow:|:Vow] s: _ (Dummy:) %^CC2C: ;
!! reißen
!!€ reiss%^CC2C%>en
!!€ rei0ß0%>en

"first of same consonant Deletion"
 Cx:0 <=> Vow: _ Cx (Dummy:) %^CC2C: ;
        where Cx in (f F t T) ;
!! treffen+V+Subj+Prt+Pl1
!!€ traff%^Umlaut%^CC2C%>en
!!€ trä0f00%>en




"Subsequent s Deletion"
 s:0 <=> [s:+|ß|x|z] (Dummy:) %> _ t ;
!! aasen+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2
!!€ aas%>st
!!€ aas%>0t
!! groß+A+Superl+Fem+Sg+Acc+Def
!!€ groß%^Umlaut%>st%>e
!!€ größ0%>0t%>e

 [Vow:|:Vow] _ s: (Dummy:) %^CC2C: ;
!! reißen
!!€ reiss%^CC2C%>en
!!€ rei0ß0%>en

"Subsequent l Deletion"
 l:0 <=> [Vow:|:Vow] _ l (Dummy:) %^CC2C: ;
!! fallen+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1
!!€ fa0ll%^A2IE%^CC2C%>en
!!€ fie0l0%>en

"Subsequent c Deletion"
 c:0 <=> Vow: _ k (Dummy:) %^CC2C: ;
!! schrecken+V+Subj+Prt+Pl1
!!€ schrack%^Umlaut%^CC2C%>en
!!€ schrä0k00%>en


"Weak e Deletion"
 e:0 <=> Vow Cns:+ _ (Dummy:+) %>: e ;
!!€ Nomade%>en#
!!€ Nomad00en0

!!$ Nomade%>en#
!!$ Nomade0en0
     Cns: _ [l|r] %^Pen: %^RmVow:  ;
!! ackern+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1
!!€ acker%^Pen%^RmVow%>e
!!€ ack0r00%>e
    Cns: _ i 0: Cns:+ %^EI2IE: ;
!! bleiben+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1
!!€ blei0b%^EI2IE
!!€ bl0ieb0
 Cns: _ i Cns:+ (Dummy:) %^EI2I: ;
!! reißen
!!€ reiss%^EI2I
!!€ r0iss0

"Devoicing of g"
 g:c <=> 
 Vow _ 0:* (Dummy:0) %^DeV: ;

!! mögen+V+Mod+Ind+Prt+Sg1
!!€ mog0%^DeV%>te
!!€ moch0%>te

"Zero to h with Devoicing"
 0:h <=> 
 Vow g: _ (Dummy:0) %^DeV: ;

!! mögen+V+Mod+Ind+Prt+Sg1
!!€ mog0%^DeV%>te
!!€ moch0%>te

"Zero to e with o to ie "
0:e <=>
 Cns: o: _ Cns:+ %^O2IE: ;
!! stoßen+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2
!!€ sto0ß%^O2IE%>e%>st
!!€ stieß0%>e%>st
 Cns: a: _ (u:) Cns:+ %^A2IE: ;
!! halten+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2
!!€ ha0lt%^A2IE%>e%>st
!!€ hielt0%>e%>st
    Cns: e: i _ Cns:+ %^EI2IE: ;
!! bleiben+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1
!!€ blei0b%^EI2IE
!!€ bl0ieb0
